Vermont, session 2025-2026, H314.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Short Title * * *
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “People over Party Provision for Vermont’s
Primary Elections Act of 2025.”
* * * Provisions for Primary Elections * * *
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. chapter 49 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 49. NOMINATIONS PRIMARY ELECTIONS
Subchapter 1. Primary Elections
§ 2351. PROVISIONS FOR PRIMARY ELECTION
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 2 of 29
A primary election shall be held on the second Tuesday in August in each
even-numbered year for the nomination of candidates of major political parties
to narrow the number of candidates for all offices to be voted for at the
succeeding general election, except candidates for President and Vice
President of the United States, their electors, and justices of the peace. A
primary election does not serve to determine the nominee of a political party.
§ 2352. NOMINATION OF CANDIDATES PRIOR TO SPECIAL
PRIMARY ELECTION
When the Governor or any court, pursuant to law, orders a special election
to be held for any of the offices covered by section 2351 of this title, a special
primary election shall be held on the Tuesday that falls not less than 60 days
nor more than 66 days prior to the date set for the special election. The
nomination of candidates prior to a special election, including nomination both
by primary and by other means, shall be governed by the rules applicable to
nomination of candidates prior to the general election, except as may be
specifically provided in this chapter. The term “general election,” as used in
this chapter, shall be deemed to include a special election, unless the context
requires a different interpretation.
§ 2353. PETITIONS TO PLACE NAMES ON BALLOT
(a) The name of any person shall be printed upon the primary ballot as a
candidate for nomination by any major political party for the office indicated,
if a petition containing the requisite number of signatures made by registered
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 3 of 29
voters, in substantially the following form, is filed with the proper official,
together with the person’s written consent to having his or her the person’s
name printed on the ballot:
I join in a petition to place on the primary ballot of the ....................... party the
name of ...................., whose residence is in the (city), (town) of ......................
in the county of ......................, for the office of ...................... to be voted for
on Tuesday, the ............... day of August, 20 ........; and I certify that I am at the
present time a registered voter and am qualified to vote for a candidate for this
office.
(b)(1) A person’s name shall not be listed as a candidate on the primary
ballot of more than one party in the same election. [Repealed.]
(2) A single petition shall contain only one office for which a person
seeks to be a candidate.
(3) A person shall file a separate petition for each office for which he or
she a person seeks to be a candidate.
§ 2354. SIGNING PETITIONS
(a) Any number of voters may sign the same petition.
(b)(1) A voter’s signature shall not be valid unless at the time he or she the
voter signs, the voter is registered and qualified to vote for the candidate whose
petition he or she the voter signs.
(2) Each voter shall indicate he or she the voter’s town of residence next
to his or her signature.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 4 of 29
(c) The signature of a voter on a candidate’s petition does not necessarily
indicate that the voter supports the candidate.
(d) A petition shall contain the name of only one candidate.
§ 2355. NUMBER OF SIGNATURES REQUIRED
The number of signatures on primary petitions shall be not less than:
(1) for State and congressional officers, 500;
(2) for county officers or State senator, 100; and
(3) for Representative to the General Assembly, 50; and
(4) for justice of the peace, 30 or one percent of the legal voters of the
municipality, whichever is less.
§ 2356. TIME FOR FILING PETITIONS
(a) Primary petitions for major party candidates shall be filed not earlier
than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the fourth
Thursday after the first Monday in May preceding the primary election
prescribed by section 2351 of this chapter, and not later than 5:00 p.m. of the
62nd day prior to the day of a special primary election.
(b) A petition or statement of nomination shall apply only to the election
cycle in which the petition or statement of nomination is filed.
§ 2357. PLACE OF FILING PETITION
(a) Primary petitions and consent forms shall be filed as follows:
(1) For State and congressional officers, with the Secretary of State;
(2) For county officers, with the county clerk;
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 5 of 29
(3) For State Senator, with the senatorial district clerk;
(4) For Representative to the General Assembly, with the representative
district clerk; and
(5) for justices of the peace, with the town clerk.
(b) The public official designated to accept a petition shall not accept a
nominating primary petition unless a completed and signed consent form is
filed at the same time.
* * *
§ 2362. PRIMARY BALLOTS
(a) A separate primary ballot for each major political party shall be printed
and furnished to the towns by the Secretary of State and shall contain the
names of all candidates for nomination by that party at the primary election.
Ballots shall be printed on index stock and configured to be readable by vote
tabulators. Ballots shall be printed in substantially the following form:
OFFICIAL VERMONT PRIMARY ELECTION BALLOT
VOTE ON ONE PARTY BALLOT ONLY AND PLACE IN BALLOT
BOX OR VOTE TABULATOR
ALL OTHER PARTY BALLOTS MUST BE PLACED IN UNVOTED
BALLOT BOX
__________________
[MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY NAME]
__________________
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 6 of 29
Instructions to voters: Use black pen or pencil to fill in the oval. To vote
for a person whose name is printed on the ballot, fill in the oval to the right of
the name of that person. To vote for a person whose name is not printed on the
ballot, write or stick his or her the person’s name in the blank space provided
and fill in the oval to the right of the write-in space. Do not vote for more
candidates than the “Vote for Not More Than” number for an office. If you
make a mistake, tear, or deface the ballot, return it to an election official and
obtain another ballot. Do not erase.
(b) Following the names of candidates printed on the primary ballot after
the name of each office to be filled shall be as many blank lines for write-in
candidates as there are persons to be elected to that office. If no primary
petition is filed for an office or for a candidate belonging to a party, the ballot
shall contain the name of the office and blank lines for write-in candidates.
(c) A primary ballot shall not indicate any party affiliation of any
candidate.
§ 2363. VOTER’S CHOICE OF PARTY
(a) A voter shall vote for the candidates of one party only. A person voting
at the primary shall not be required to indicate his or her party choice to any
election official.
(b) [Repealed.] [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 7 of 29
§ 2369. DETERMINING WINNER WINNERS; TIE VOTES
(a) A person who receives a plurality of all the votes cast by a party in a
primary shall be a candidate of that party be placed for the office designated on
the ballot Determining winners. Only the four candidates who receive the
greatest number of votes for an office in a primary election shall be determined
to have won the primary election for that office and shall, except as provided in
17 V.S.A. § 2475, be placed on the ballot for that office for the subsequent
general election.
(b)(1) Ties. If any primary election results in more than four candidates
qualifying to be placed on the ballot for an office for the general election
because of a tie in the number of votes received by candidates, and after the
period for requesting a recount under section 2602 of this title has expired, no
candidate has requested a recount and two or more candidates of the same
party of the four candidates to receive the most votes are tied for the same
office, or if the results of recount result in a tie, the choice among those tied
shall be determined upon five days’ notice and not later than 10 days following
the primary election by the committee of that party, which shall meet to
nominate a candidate from among the tied candidates the Secretary of State
shall resolve the tie by lot to determine which candidates have won the primary
election and shall be placed on the ballot for that office for the subsequent
general election. The Secretary of State shall notify each active candidate
involved in the tie, or the candidate’s designee, to be present at the Secretary of
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 8 of 29
State’s office at a certain time. At that time, the Secretary of State shall select
the winner of the tabulation by lot. “By lot” means a method, determined by
the Secretary of State, for randomly choosing between two or more candidates.
The committee that nominates a candidate shall be as follows:
(A) the State committee of a party for a State or congressional office;
(B) the senatorial district committee for State Senate;
(C) the county committee for county office; or
(D) the representative district committee for a Representative to the
General Assembly.
(2) The committee chair shall certify the candidate nomination for the
general election to the Secretary of State within 48 hours of the nomination.
§ 2370. WRITE-IN CANDIDATES
(a) A write-in candidate shall not qualify as a primary winner unless he or
she the candidate receives at least one-half the number of votes as the number
of signatures required for his or her the candidate’s office on a primary
petition, except that if a write-in candidate receives more votes than a
candidate whose name is printed on the ballot, he or she the write-in candidate
may qualify as a primary winner.
(b) The write-in candidate who qualifies as a primary winner under this
section must still be determined a winner under section 2369 of this chapter
before he or she becomes the party’s candidate shall be placed on the ballot for
the subsequent general election.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 9 of 29
§ 2371. NOMINEES; NOTICE TO NOMINEES PRIMARY ELECTION
WINNERS
(a) The canvassing committee shall prepare and sign certificates of
nomination advancement and mail or deliver in person to each winning
candidate nominated a notice of his or her nomination the candidate’s
advancement within two days after their meeting. On each certificate the
canvassing committee shall indicate the name, town of residence, party
affiliation, and mailing address of the winning candidate nominated. At the
same time that they mail or deliver the certificates of nomination advancement,
the canvassing committees shall also file with the office of the Secretary of
State a list showing the vote for each candidate of each party for each office.
(b) Unless a person winning candidate who is notified of being nominated
withdraws the candidacy, the person’s name, and residence, and party
affiliation shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the same manner
as they appear in the notice of nomination advancement; provided, however,
that within five days of the date of mailing or personal delivery a candidate
may request that an error in the candidate’s name, or residence, or party
affiliation be corrected or that the candidate’s preference as to the candidate’s
own name be used on the ballot. The candidate shall also have the right to
make the choice as set forth in section 2474 of this title.
Subchapter 2. Nomination by Party Committee
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 10 of 29
§ 2381. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
(a) A candidate may also be nominated and have the candidate’s name
printed on the general election ballot in accordance with the provisions set
forth in this subchapter, in the following instances:
(1) In case of a vacancy on the general election ballot occasioned by
death, removal, or withdrawal of a candidate, or the failure of a major political
party to nominate a candidate by primary;
(2) In case a minor political party desires to nominate a candidate for
any office for which major political parties nominate candidates by primary or
for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States;
(3) In case of nomination for the office of justice of the peace, in the
event that such nomination has not already been made by caucus as provided in
section 2413 of this chapter.
(b) In no event may any committee nominate a candidate or candidates for
statewide office under this subchapter unless the political party has town
committees organized in at least 10 towns in this State in accordance with
procedures in chapter 45 of this title. [Repealed.]
§ 2382. WHICH COMMITTEE TO NOMINATE
Nominations of party candidates pursuant to this subchapter shall be made
by the following political committee of the party:
(1) By the State committee in the case of President and Vice President
of the United States or State or congressional officers;
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 11 of 29
(2) By the county committee in the case of county officers;
(3) By the senatorial district committee in the case of the office of State
Senator;
(4) By the representative district committee in the case of the office of
Representative to the General Assembly;
(5) By the town committee in the case of the office of justice of the
peace. [Repealed.]
§ 2383. NOTICE OF MEETINGS
The chair of the appropriate committee, or if the chair has not called a
meeting then any three members of the committee, may set a date, time, and
place for a committee meeting for the nomination of candidates pursuant to
this subchapter and shall give not less than five days’ notice in writing to all
members of the committee. The notice shall specifically state the offices for
which nominations may be made. [Repealed.]
§ 2384. PROCEDURE UPON MEETING
At the time and place set for the meeting, the committee shall proceed to
nominate such candidates as it may desire pursuant to this subchapter.
Nomination shall require a majority of those present and voting, and if no
candidate shall have received a majority after two ballots, the candidate with
the lowest number of votes in the second and in each succeeding ballot shall be
eliminated until a candidate receives a majority. [Repealed.]
§ 2385. STATEMENT BY COMMITTEE OFFICERS; CONSENT OF
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 12 of 29
CANDIDATE
(a) When a nomination is made under the provisions of this subchapter, the
chair and the secretary of the committee making the nomination shall file a
statement of nomination in substantially the following form:
“The ................................ met on ............ and nominated the
(name of committee) (date)
following person (or persons) to be a candidate (or candidates) of the
................................... for the office (or offices) indicated
(Name of political party)
.........................................
(Name of candidate) (residence) (office for which
nominated)
“Notice of the meeting was properly given in compliance with all requirements
of section 2383 of this title and the procedures required by section 2384 of this
title were followed. A copy of the notice of the meeting is attached.
“We swear under oath that we understand the above provisions of law and that
the statements we have made in this document are true.
Sworn to before me
................................................................................
Notary Public Signature of Chair
................................................................................”
Date Signature of Secretary
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 13 of 29
(b) The statement of nomination shall be signed by the chair or acting chair
and secretary or acting secretary of the committee making the nomination.
They shall swear in their statement of nomination that the notice requirements
of section 2383 of this title and procedural requirements of section 2384 of this
title were complied with and that the persons listed as candidates were
nominated at the meeting.
(c) A copy of the notice that was sent to all committee members pursuant to
section 2383 of this title shall be filed along with the statement of nomination.
(d) Except in the case of nominations for justice of the peace, the candidate
named in the statement shall file a consent to having the candidate’s name
printed on the ballot, similar in form to the consent required in section 2361 of
this title before the last day for filing statements of nomination. It shall be
sufficient for meeting this requirement if the candidate signs the statement of
nomination with a statement in substantially the following form:
“I consent to having my name printed on the general election ballot for the
office of _________________________________________ .
(office for which nomination was made)
My name (as I wish it to appear on the ballot), town or city of residence, and
party are as follows:
________ _____________
_________________________________________
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 14 of 29
Name (please print) Town of residence (please print) Party (please
print)
____ _________________________________________
Date Signature of Candidate
_________________________________________ ”
Mailing Address
(e) In the case of nominations by town committee or caucus for the office
of justice of the peace, before filing the statement of nomination the chair,
acting chair, secretary, or acting secretary shall check with each nominee and
confirm that he or she consents to have his or her name printed on the ballot as
a candidate for that position and to serve if elected. [Repealed.]
§ 2386. TIME FOR FILING STATEMENTS
(a) In the case of the failure of a major political party to nominate a
candidate by primary, a statement shall be filed not later than 5:00 p.m. on the
sixth day following the primary.
(b) In the case of the death or withdrawal of a candidate after the primary
election, the party committee shall have seven days from the date of the death
or withdrawal to nominate a candidate. In no event shall a statement be filed
later than 60 days prior to the general election.
(c)(1) In the case of a nomination by a minor political party, a statement
shall be filed not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than
5:00 p.m. on the Thursday preceding the primary election described in section
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 15 of 29
2351 of this chapter and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the third day prior to the
day of a special primary election.
(2) A statement shall apply only to the election cycle in which the
statement is filed.
(d) In the case of a nomination for the office of justice of the peace, a
statement shall be filed as set forth in section 2413 of this chapter. [Repealed.]
§ 2387. PLACE FOR FILING STATEMENTS
Statements for the office of justice of the peace shall be filed with the town
clerk. All other statements and consents shall be filed with the Secretary of
State. [Repealed.]
Subchapter 3. Independent Candidates
§ 2401. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
A person may be nominated and have his or her name printed on the general
election ballot for any office by filing a consent similar in form to the consent
prescribed by section 2361 of this title and a statement of nomination with the
Secretary of State. In the case of a nomination for justice of the peace, the
consent form and statement of nomination shall be filed with the town clerk.
[Repealed.]
§ 2402. REQUISITES OF STATEMENT
(a) A statement of nomination shall contain:
(1) The name of the office for which the nomination is made.
(2) The candidate’s name and residence.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 16 of 29
(3) If desired, a name, or other identification (in not more than three
words) to be printed on the ballot following the candidate’s name.
(4) In the case of nomination for President or Vice President of the
United States:
(A) The name and state of residence of each candidate for such
office, together with the name, town of residence, and correct mailing address
of each nominee for the office of elector.
(B)(i) The original statement of nomination shall include a
certification by the town clerk of each town where the signers appear to be
voters that the persons whose names appear as signers of the statement are
registered voters in the town and of the total number of valid signers from the
town.
(ii) Only the number of signers certified as registered voters by
each town clerk on the original statement of nomination forms shall count
toward the required number of signatures.
(C) The statement shall also be accompanied by a consent form from
each nominee for elector. The consent form shall be similar to the consent
form prescribed in section 2361 of this title.
(b)(1) To constitute a valid nomination, a statement shall contain signatures
of voters qualified to vote in an election for the office in question, equal in
number to at least:
(A) for presidential and vice presidential offices, 1,000;
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 17 of 29
(B) for State and congressional offices, 500;
(C) for county officers or State Senators, 100;
(D) for Representative to the General Assembly, 50;
(E) for justice of the peace, 30 or one percent of the legal voters of
the municipality, whichever is less.
(2) Signatures need not all be contained on one paper.
(c) A statement shall state that each signer is qualified to vote in an election
for the office in question and that the voter’s residence is as set forth next to
the voter’s name.
(d)(1) A statement of nomination and a completed and signed consent form
shall be filed:
(A) in the case of nomination for President or Vice President of the
United States, not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than
5:00 p.m. on the August 1 preceding the presidential general election;
(B) in the case of nomination for justice of the peace, not earlier than
the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the third day
following the primary election; or
(C) in the case of any other independent candidate, not earlier than
the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the Thursday
preceding the primary election prescribed by section 2351 of this chapter, and
not later than 5:00 p.m. of the third day prior to the day of a special primary
election.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 18 of 29
(2) A public official receiving nominations shall not accept a petition
unless a completed and signed consent form is filed at the same time.
(3) A statement of nomination shall apply only to the election cycle in
which the statement of nomination is filed.
(e) The Secretary of State shall prescribe and furnish forms for a statement
of nomination.
(f) In the event that an independent vice presidential candidate withdraws
in accordance with section 2412 of this chapter, the presidential candidate may
submit to the Secretary of State on or before the ballot printing deadline a new
consent form signed by the presidential candidate and his or her new vice
presidential candidate. [Repealed.]
§ 2403. NUMBER OF CANDIDATES; PARTY NAMES
(a)(1) A statement of nomination shall contain the name of only one
candidate, except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates,
who may be nominated by means of the same statement of nomination.
(2) A single statement of nomination shall contain only one office for
which a person seeks to be a candidate.
(b)(1) The political or other name on a statement of nomination shall be
substantially different from the name of any organized political party. It shall
also be substantially different from the political or other name already
appearing on any other statement of nomination for the same office then on file
with the same officer for the same election.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 19 of 29
(2) If the Secretary of State determines that it is not substantially
different, the candidate named on the statement shall select a different political
or other name; otherwise the Secretary shall print the word “Independent” on
the ballot for that candidate.
(c)(1) Except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates,
the word “independent” may not be used as part of a party name.
(2) If no party is indicated, the word “Independent” shall be printed on
the ballot.
(3) A candidate appearing on the ballot as a candidate of a political party
shall not also appear on the ballot as an “Independent.” [Repealed.]
§ 2404. PRESERVATION OF STATEMENTS
The Secretary of State shall preserve all statements until three months after
the general election, after which they may be destroyed. [Repealed.]
Subchapter 4. Miscellaneous Provisions
§ 2411. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW
Except as specifically provided in this chapter, all other provisions of this
title shall govern the several procedures specified in this chapter for the
making of nominations conduct of primary elections.
§ 2412. WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDACY
(a)(1) A candidate who has been validly nominated by one of the methods
prescribed in this chapter shall have a right to withdraw his or her candidacy
up until 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day following the primary by filing a written
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 20 of 29
notice of withdrawal with the town clerk in the case of a candidate for justice
of the peace, and with the Secretary of State in the case of all other offices.
(2) The name of a candidate who has withdrawn in accordance with the
provisions of this subsection shall not be printed on the ballot.
(b) After the date described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if the
candidate has filed a written notice of withdrawal, the town clerk or Secretary
of State may still remove the candidate’s name from the ballot up until the
printing deadline. [Repealed.]
§ 2413. NOMINATION OF JUSTICES OF THE PEACE
(a)(1) The party members in each town, on or before each primary election,
upon the call of the town committee, may meet in caucus and nominate
candidates for justice of the peace.
(2)(A) The committee shall give notice of the caucus by posting notice
at the office of the town clerk and two other public places in the town at least
five days prior to the caucus.
(B) In addition, for towns with over 3,000 voters, the committee shall
post this notice at least one day prior to the caucus:
(i)(I) in a newspaper of general circulation within the town; or
(II) on a nonpartisan electronic news media website that
specializes in news of the State or the community; and
(ii) on the municipality’s website, if the municipality actively
updates its website on a regular basis.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 21 of 29
(3) [Repealed.]
(b) If it does not hold a caucus as provided in subsection (a) of this section,
the town committee shall meet and nominate candidates for justices of the
peace as provided in sections 2381 through 2385 of this title. At least three
days prior to this meeting, the town committee shall provide notice of the
meeting by e-mailing or mailing committee members and by posting notice of
the meeting in the office of the town clerk and in two other public places in the
town.
(c) In any town in which a political party has not formally organized, any
three members of the party who are voters in the town may call a caucus to
nominate candidates for justice of the peace by giving notice as required in
subsection (a) of this section. Upon meeting, the caucus shall first elect a chair
and a secretary. Thereafter the caucus shall nominate its candidates for justice
of the peace.
(d) [Repealed.]
(e) For any nomination made under this section, the chair and secretary of
the committee or caucus shall file the statement required by section 2385 of
this title by 5:00 p.m. on the third day following the primary election.
[Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 17 V.S.A. chapter 51, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. Ballots
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 22 of 29
* * *
§ 2472. CONTENTS
* * *
(b)(1) Each office to be voted upon shall be separately indicated and
preceded by the word “For,” as: “For United States Senator.” Beneath the
office to be voted upon shall appear the instructions: “Vote for not more than
(the number of candidates to be elected).”
(2) The names of the candidates for each office shall be listed in
alphabetical order by surname, followed by the candidate’s town of residence,
and the party or parties by which the candidate has been nominated, or in the
case of independent candidates who have not chosen some other name or
identification, by the word “Independent.” The word “party” shall not be
printed on the ballot following a candidate’s party name.
(3) To the right of the party designation surname shall be an oval in
which the voter may indicate his or her choice by filling in the oval.
(4) A candidate’s name shall not appear on the ballot more than once for
any one office.
* * *
§ 2474. CHOICE OF PARTY
(a)(1) A person nominated by any means for the same office by more than
one political party may elect, not later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth day
following the primary election, the party or parties in which the nominee will
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 23 of 29
be a candidate. The nominee shall notify in writing the Secretary of State or
town clerk, as the case may be, of such choice by that deadline, and only the
party or parties that the nominee so elects shall be printed next to the
nominee’s name on the ballot.
(2) If the nominee does not notify the Secretary of State or the town
clerk of his or her choice of party, the Secretary of State shall print on the
ballot those parties next to the nominee’s name by listing in this order:
(A) the major political party for which the nominee had his or her
name printed on the ballot in the primary;
(B) any major political parties that nominated the nominee by the
party committee, in the order in which the nominations were submitted to the
Secretary of State;
(C) any major political parties for which the nominee received write-
in votes, in an order from highest to lowest vote counts; and
(D) any minor political parties that nominated the nominee by party
committee, in the order in which the nominations were submitted to the
Secretary of State.
(b)(1) A candidate for State office who is the nominee of two or more
political parties shall file with the Secretary of State, not later than 5:00 p.m.
the tenth day following the primary election, a statement designating for which
party the votes cast for him or her shall be counted for the purposes of
determining whether his or her designated party shall be a major political
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 24 of 29
party. The party so designated shall be the first party to be printed
immediately after the candidate’s name on the ballot.
(2) If a candidate does not file the statement by that deadline, the
Secretary of State shall designate the party for which the votes cast shall be
counted as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section. [Repealed.]
§ 2475. DEATH OR WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDATE
(a) When a candidate dies or withdraws and the vacancy is filled as
provided in chapter 49 of this title, the name supplied for the vacancy shall be
inserted instead of the original nomination Withdrawal. A candidate who wins
a primary election pursuant to section 2369 of this title shall have a right to
withdraw up until 5:00 p.m. on the 10th day following a primary election by
filing a written notice of withdrawal with the town clerk in the case of a
candidate for justice of the peace, and with the Secretary of State in the case of
all other offices.
(b) Replacement of withdrawn or deceased primary candidates. A winning
primary candidate who withdraws pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or
who dies between a primary election and the 10th day following a primary
election shall be replaced on the general election ballot by the primary
candidate who received the next greatest number of votes for that office in the
primary election after any other winners of the primary election.
(c) Printing. After the 10th day following a primary election, if a winning
primary candidate withdraws or dies, the town clerk or Secretary of State may
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 25 of 29
still remove the candidate’s name from the ballot up until the printing deadline.
If the ballots have already been printed, the officer who furnished them shall
prepare and furnish new ballots. The town clerk in each town shall, upon
delivery of the new ballots, immediately destroy all original ballots except
those already supplied to or used by early or absentee voters. Such early or
absentee voter ballots shall be acceptable and counted with the other ballots.
* * *
* * * Miscellaneous Cross-References * * *
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 1881a is amended to read:
§ 1881a. SENATORIAL DISTRICTS; NOMINATIONS AND ELECTION
* * *
(c)(1) Petitions for nominating candidates for Senator in the General
Assembly by primary or by certificates of nomination of candidates for that
office by convention, caucus, committee, or voters election under chapter 49 of
this title may be filed in the office of any county clerk in a senatorial district.
(2)(A) On the day after the last day for filing those petitions or
certificates for that office, the other county clerk shall notify the senatorial
district clerk of the facts concerning those petitions or certificates.
(B) The senatorial district clerk shall be responsible for determining
the names of candidates and other facts required by law to appear on the ballot
for the office of Senator and for obtaining and distributing the ballots to the
other clerks in the district.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 26 of 29
(d) The clerk of the less populous county in a senatorial district shall report
the results of voting in his or her the clerk’s county immediately after they are
determined to the senatorial district clerk, who shall issue the certificates of
nomination advancement or election required by law as to the office of
Senator.
* * *
Sec. 5. 17 V.S.A. § 2721 is amended to read:
§ 2721. NOMINATION OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS
(a) In presidential election years, presidential electors for major political
parties shall be nominated at the party platform convention held pursuant to
this title.
(b) Electors for all other presidential candidates shall be nominated
pursuant to chapter 49, subchapter 3 of this title. as follows:
(1) Requisites of statement.
(A) A statement of nomination shall contain the name and state of
residence of each candidate for such office, together with the name, town of
residence, and correct mailing address of each nominee for the office of
elector.
(B)(i) The original statement of nomination shall include a
certification by the town clerk of each town where the signers appear to be
voters that the persons whose names appear as signers of the statement are
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 27 of 29
registered voters in the town and of the total number of valid signers from the
town.
(ii) Only the number of signers certified as registered voters by
each town clerk on the original statement of nomination forms shall count
toward the required number of signatures.
(C) The statement shall also be accompanied by a consent form from
each nominee for elector. The consent form shall be similar to the consent
form prescribed in section 2361 of this title.
(D)(i) To constitute a valid nomination for presidential and vice
presidential offices, a statement shall contain signatures of voters qualified to
vote in an election for the office in question, equal in number to at least 1,000.
(ii) Signatures need not all be contained on one paper.
(E) A statement shall state that each signer is qualified to vote in an
election for the office in question and that the voter’s residence is as set forth
next to the voter’s name.
(F)(i) In the case of nomination for President or Vice President of the
United States, a statement of nomination and a completed and signed consent
form shall be filed not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later
than 5:00 p.m. on the August 1 preceding the presidential general election.
(ii) A public official receiving nominations shall not accept a
petition unless a completed and signed consent form is filed at the same time.
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 28 of 29
(iii) A statement of nomination shall apply only to the election
cycle in which the statement of nomination is filed.
(G) The Secretary of State shall prescribe and furnish forms for a
statement of nomination.
(H) In the event that an independent vice presidential candidate
withdraws in accordance with section 2412 of this chapter, the presidential
candidate may submit to the Secretary of State on or before the ballot printing
deadline a new consent form signed by the presidential candidate and the
presidential candidate’s new vice presidential candidate.
(2) Number of candidates; party names.
(A)(i) Presidential and vice presidential candidates may be nominated
by means of the same statement of nomination.
(ii) A single statement of nomination shall contain only one office
for which a person seeks to be a candidate.
(B)(i) The political or other name on a statement of nomination shall
be substantially different from the name of any organized political party. It
shall also be substantially different from the political or other name already
appearing on any other statement of nomination for the same office then on file
with the same officer for the same election.
(ii) If the Secretary of State determines that it is not substantially
different, the candidate named on the statement shall select a different political
VT LEG #380916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.314
2025 Page 29 of 29
or other name; otherwise the Secretary shall print the word “Independent” on
the ballot for that candidate.
(3) Preservation of statements. The Secretary of State shall preserve all
statements until three months after the general election, after which they may
be destroyed.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380916 v.1